Florida, session 2026, HB1541.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
33
34 Section 1. Present subsections (5) through (35) of section
35 718.103, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6)
36 through (36), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to
37 that section, to read:
38 718.103 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
39 (5) "Audio conference" means a real-time, audio-based
40 meeting between two or more people in different locations using
41 an audio-enabled device.
42 Section 2. Paragraphs (a) and (g) of subsection (12) of
43 section 718.111, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
44 718.111 The association.—
45 (12) OFFICIAL RECORDS.—
46 (a) From the inception of the association, the association
47 shall maintain each of the following items, if applicable, which
48 constitutes the official records of the association:
49 1. A copy of the plans, permits, warranties, and other
50 items provided by the developer under s. 718.301(4).
Page 2 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
51 2. A copy of the recorded declaration of condominium of
52 each condominium operated by the association and each amendment
53 to each declaration.
54 3. A copy of the recorded bylaws of the association and
55 each amendment to the bylaws.
56 4. A certified copy of the articles of incorporation of
57 the association, or other documents creating the association,
58 and each amendment thereto.
59 5. A copy of the current rules of the association.
60 6. A book or books or electronic records that contain the
61 minutes of all meetings of the association, the board of
62 administration, any committee, and the unit owners, and a
63 recording of all such meetings that are conducted by audio
64 conference or video conference, or both. If there are approved
65 minutes for a meeting held by audio conference or video
66 conference, or both, recordings of meetings that are conducted
67 by audio conference or video conference, or both, must be
68 maintained for at least 1 year after the date the audio or video
69 recording is posted as required under paragraph (g).
70 7. A current roster of all unit owners and their mailing
71 addresses, unit identifications, voting certifications, and, if
72 known, telephone numbers. The association shall also maintain
73 the e-mail addresses and facsimile numbers of unit owners
74 consenting to receive notice by electronic transmission. In
75 accordance with sub-subparagraph (c)5.e., the e-mail addresses
Page 3 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
76 and facsimile numbers are only accessible to unit owners if
77 consent to receive notice by electronic transmission is
78 provided, or if the unit owner has expressly indicated that such
79 personal information can be shared with other unit owners and
80 the unit owner has not provided the association with a request
81 to opt out of such dissemination with other unit owners. An
82 association must ensure that the e-mail addresses and facsimile
83 numbers are only used for the business operation of the
84 association and may not be sold or shared with outside third
85 parties. If such personal information is included in documents
86 that are released to third parties, other than unit owners, the
87 association must redact such personal information before the
88 document is disseminated. However, the association is not liable
89 for an inadvertent disclosure of the e-mail address or facsimile
90 number for receiving electronic transmission of notices unless
91 such disclosure was made with a knowing or intentional disregard
92 of the protected nature of such information.
93 8. All current insurance policies of the association and
94 condominiums operated by the association.
95 9. A current copy of any management agreement, lease, or
96 other contract to which the association is a party or under
97 which the association or the unit owners have an obligation or
98 responsibility.
99 10. Bills of sale or transfer for all property owned by
100 the association.
Page 4 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
101 11. Accounting records for the association and separate
102 accounting records for each condominium that the association
103 operates. Any person who knowingly or intentionally defaces or
104 destroys such records, or who knowingly or intentionally fails
105 to create or maintain such records, with the intent of causing
106 harm to the association or one or more of its members, is
107 personally subject to a civil penalty pursuant to s.
108 718.501(1)(e). The accounting records must include, but are not
109 limited to:
110 a. Accurate, itemized, and detailed records of all
111 receipts and expenditures, including all bank statements and
112 ledgers.
113 b. All invoices, transaction receipts, or deposit slips
114 that substantiate any receipt or expenditure of funds by the
115 association.
116 c. A current account and a monthly, bimonthly, or
117 quarterly statement of the account for each unit designating the
118 name of the unit owner, the due date and amount of each
119 assessment, the amount paid on the account, and the balance due.
120 d. All audits, reviews, accounting statements, structural
121 integrity reserve studies, and financial reports of the
122 association or condominium. Structural integrity reserve studies
123 must be maintained for at least 15 years after the study is
124 completed.
125 e. All contracts for work to be performed. Bids for work
Page 5 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
126 to be performed are also considered official records and must be
127 maintained by the association for at least 1 year after receipt
128 of the bid.
129 12. Ballots, sign-in sheets, voting proxies, and all other
130 papers and electronic records relating to voting by unit owners,
131 which must be maintained for 1 year from the date of the
132 election, vote, or meeting to which the document relates,
133 notwithstanding paragraph (b).
134 13. All rental records if the association is acting as
135 agent for the rental of condominium units.
136 14. A copy of the current question and answer sheet as
137 described in s. 718.504.
138 15. A copy of the inspection reports described in ss.
139 553.899 and 718.301(4)(p) and any other inspection report
140 relating to a structural or life safety inspection of
141 condominium property. Such record must be maintained by the
142 association for 15 years after receipt of the report.
143 16. Bids for materials, equipment, or services.
144 17. All affirmative acknowledgments made pursuant to s.
145 718.121(4)(c).
146 18. A copy of all building permits.
147 19. A copy of all satisfactorily completed board member
148 educational certificates.
149 20. A copy of all affidavits required by this chapter.
150 21. All other written records of the association not
Page 6 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
151 specifically included in the foregoing which are related to the
152 operation of the association.
153 (g)1. An association managing a condominium with 25 or
154 more units which does not contain timeshare units shall post
155 digital copies of the documents specified in subparagraph 2. on
156 its website or make such documents available through an
157 application that can be downloaded on a mobile device. Unless a
158 shorter period is otherwise required, a document must be made
159 available on the association's website or made available for
160 download through an application on a mobile device within 30
161 days after the association receives or creates an official
162 record specified in subparagraph 2.
163 a. The association's website or application must be:
164 (I) An independent website, application, or web portal
165 wholly owned and operated by the association; or
166 (II) A website, application, or web portal operated by a
167 third-party provider with whom the association owns, leases,
168 rents, or otherwise obtains the right to operate a web page,
169 subpage, web portal, collection of subpages or web portals, or
170 an application which is dedicated to the association's
171 activities and on which required notices, records, and documents
172 may be posted or made available by the association.
173 b. The association's website or application must be
174 accessible through the Internet and must contain a subpage, web
175 portal, or other protected electronic location that is
Page 7 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
176 inaccessible to the general public and accessible only to unit
177 owners and employees of the association.
178 c. Upon a unit owner's written request, the association
179 must provide the unit owner with a username and password and
180 access to the protected sections of the association's website or
181 application which contain any notices, records, or documents
182 that must be electronically provided.
183 2. A current copy of the following documents must be
184 posted in digital format on the association's website or
185 application:
186 a. The recorded declaration of condominium of each
187 condominium operated by the association and each amendment to
188 each declaration.
189 b. The recorded bylaws of the association and each
190 amendment to the bylaws.
191 c. The articles of incorporation of the association, or
192 other documents creating the association, and each amendment to
193 the articles of incorporation or other documents. The copy
194 posted pursuant to this sub-subparagraph must be a copy of the
195 articles of incorporation filed with the Department of State.
196 d. The rules of the association.
197 e. The approved minutes of all board of administration
198 meetings over the preceding 12 months.
199 f. The audio or video recording or a hyperlink to the
200 audio or video recording for all meetings of the association,
Page 8 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
201 the board of administration, any committee, and the unit owners
202 which were are conducted by audio conference or video
203 conference, or both, over the preceding 12 months.
204 g. A list of all executory contracts or documents to which
205 the association is a party or under which the association or the
206 unit owners have an obligation or responsibility and, after
207 bidding for the related materials, equipment, or services has
208 closed, a list of bids received by the association within the
209 past year. Summaries of bids for materials, equipment, or
210 services which exceed $500 must be maintained on the website or
211 application for 1 year. In lieu of summaries, complete copies of
212 the bids may be posted.
213 h. The annual budget required by s. 718.112(2)(f) and any
214 proposed budget to be considered at the annual meeting.
215 i. The financial report required by subsection (13) and
216 any monthly income or expense statement to be considered at a
217 meeting.
218 j. The certification of each director required by s.
219 718.112(2)(d)4.b.
220 k. All contracts or transactions between the association
221 and any director, officer, corporation, firm, or association
222 that is not an affiliated condominium association or any other
223 entity in which an association director is also a director or
224 officer and financially interested.
225 l. Any contract or document regarding a conflict of
Page 9 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
226 interest or possible conflict of interest as provided in ss.
227 468.4335, 468.436(2)(b)6., and 718.3027(3).
228 m. The notice of any unit owner meeting and the agenda for
229 the meeting, as required by s. 718.112(2)(d)3., no later than 14
230 days before the meeting. The notice must be posted in plain view
231 on the front page of the website or application, or on a
232 separate subpage of the website or application labeled "Notices"
233 which is conspicuously visible and linked from the front page.
234 The association must also post on its website or application any
235 document to be considered and voted on by the owners during the
236 meeting or any document listed on the agenda at least 7 days
237 before the meeting at which the document or the information
238 within the document will be considered.
239 n. Notice of any board meeting, the agenda, and any other
240 document required for the meeting as required by s.
241 718.112(2)(c), which must be posted no later than the date
242 required for notice under s. 718.112(2)(c).
243 o. The inspection reports described in ss. 553.899 and
244 718.301(4)(p) and any other inspection report relating to a
245 structural or life safety inspection of condominium property.
246 p. The association's most recent structural integrity
247 reserve study, if applicable.
248 q. Copies of all building permits issued for ongoing or
249 planned construction.
250 r. A copy of all affidavits required by this chapter.
Page 10 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
251 3. The association shall ensure that the information and
252 records described in paragraph (c), which are not allowed to be
253 accessible to unit owners, are not posted on the association's
254 website or application. If protected information or information
255 restricted from being accessible to unit owners is included in
256 documents that are required to be posted on the association's
257 website or application, the association shall ensure the
258 information is redacted before posting the documents.
259 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the association or its agent is
260 not liable for disclosing information that is protected or
261 restricted under this paragraph unless such disclosure was made
262 with a knowing or intentional disregard of the protected or
263 restricted nature of such information.
264 4. The failure of the association to post information
265 required under subparagraph 2. is not in and of itself
266 sufficient to invalidate any action or decision of the
267 association's board or its committees.
268 Section 3. Paragraphs (b) through (e) of subsection (2) of
269 section 718.112, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
270 718.112 Bylaws.—
271 (2) REQUIRED PROVISIONS.—The bylaws shall provide for the
272 following and, if they do not do so, shall be deemed to include
273 the following:
274 (b) Quorum; voting requirements; proxies.—
275 1. Unless a lower number is provided in the bylaws, the
Page 11 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
276 percentage of voting interests required to constitute a quorum
277 at a meeting of the members is a majority of the voting
278 interests. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the
279 declaration, articles of incorporation, or bylaws, and except as
280 provided in subparagraph (d)4., decisions shall be made by a
281 majority of the voting interests represented at a meeting at
282 which a quorum is present.
283 2. Except as specifically otherwise provided herein, unit
284 owners in a residential condominium may not vote by general
285 proxy, but may vote by limited proxies substantially conforming
286 to a limited proxy form adopted by the division. A voting
287 interest or consent right allocated to a unit owned by the
288 association may not be exercised or considered for any purpose,
289 whether for a quorum, an election, or otherwise. Limited proxies
290 and general proxies may be used to establish a quorum. Limited
291 proxies shall be used for votes taken to waive or reduce
292 reserves in accordance with subparagraph (f)2.; for votes taken
293 to waive the financial reporting requirements of s. 718.111(13);
294 for votes taken to amend the declaration pursuant to s. 718.110;
295 for votes taken to amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws
296 pursuant to this section; and for any other matter for which
297 this chapter requires or permits a vote of the unit owners.
298 Except as provided in paragraph (d), a proxy, limited or
299 general, may not be used in the election of board members in a
300 residential condominium. General proxies may be used for other
Page 12 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
301 matters for which limited proxies are not required, and may be
302 used in voting for nonsubstantive changes to items for which a
303 limited proxy is required and given. Notwithstanding this
304 subparagraph, unit owners may vote in person at unit owner
305 meetings. This subparagraph does not limit the use of general
306 proxies or require the use of limited proxies for any agenda
307 item or election at any meeting of a timeshare condominium
308 association or a nonresidential condominium association.
309 3. A proxy given is effective only for the specific
310 meeting for which originally given and any lawfully adjourned
311 meetings thereof. A proxy is not valid longer than 90 days after
312 the date of the first meeting for which it was given. Each proxy
313 is revocable at any time at the pleasure of the unit owner
314 executing it.
315 4. A member of the board of administration or a committee
316 may submit in writing his or her agreement or disagreement with
317 any action taken at a meeting that the member did not attend.
318 This agreement or disagreement may not be used as a vote for or
319 against the action taken or to create a quorum.
320 5. A board meeting may be conducted in person or by audio
321 conference or video conference, or both. A board or committee
322 member's participation in a meeting via telephone, real-time
323 audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar real-time
324 electronic, audio, or video communication counts toward a
325 quorum, and such member may vote as if physically present. A
Page 13 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
326 speaker must be used so that the conversation of such members
327 may be heard by the board or committee members attending in
328 person as well as by any unit owners present at a meeting. The
329 division shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536 and 120.54
330 governing the requirements for meetings.
331 (c) Board of administration meetings.—In a residential
332 condominium association of more than 10 units, the board of
333 administration shall meet at least once each quarter. At least
334 four times each year, the meeting agenda must include an
335 opportunity for members to ask questions of the board. Meetings
336 of the board of administration at which a quorum of the members
337 is present are open to all unit owners. Members of the board of
338 administration may use e-mail as a means of communication but
339 may not cast a vote on an association matter via e-mail. A unit
340 owner may tape record or videotape the meetings. The right to
341 attend such meetings includes the right to speak at such
342 meetings with reference to all designated agenda items and the
343 right to ask questions relating to reports on the status of
344 construction or repair projects, the status of revenues and
345 expenditures during the current fiscal year, and other issues
346 affecting the condominium. The division shall adopt reasonable
347 rules governing the tape recording and videotaping of the
348 meeting. The association may adopt written reasonable rules
349 governing the frequency, duration, and manner of unit owner
350 statements.
Page 14 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
351 1. Adequate notice of all board meetings, which must
352 specifically identify all agenda items, must be posted
353 conspicuously on the condominium property at least 48 continuous
354 hours before the meeting except in an emergency. If the board
355 meeting is to be conducted via audio conference or video
356 conference, or both, the notice must state that such meeting
357 will be via audio conference or video conference, or both, and
358 must include a hyperlink and a conference telephone number for
359 unit owners to attend the meeting via video conference, as well
360 as the address of the physical location where the unit owners
361 can attend the meeting in person. If the meeting is conducted
362 via audio conference or video conference, or both, it must be
363 recorded and such recording must be maintained as an official
364 record of the association. If 20 percent of the voting interests
365 petition the board to address an item of business, the board,
366 within 60 days after receipt of the petition, must shall place
367 the item on the agenda at its next regular board meeting or at a
368 special meeting called for that purpose. An item not included on
369 the notice may be taken up on an emergency basis by a vote of at
370 least a majority plus one of the board members. Such emergency
371 action must be noticed and ratified at the next regular board
372 meeting. Written notice of a meeting at which a nonemergency
373 special assessment or an amendment to rules regarding unit use
374 will be considered must be mailed, delivered, or electronically
375 transmitted to the unit owners and posted conspicuously on the
Page 15 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
376 condominium property at least 14 days before the meeting.
377 Evidence of compliance with this 14-day notice requirement must
378 be made by an affidavit executed by the person providing the
379 notice and filed with the official records of the association.
380 2. Upon notice to the unit owners, the board shall, by
381 duly adopted rule, designate a specific location on the
382 condominium property at which all notices of board meetings must
383 be posted. If there is no condominium property at which notices
384 can be posted, notices must shall be mailed, delivered, or
385 electronically transmitted to each unit owner at least 14 days
386 before the meeting. In lieu of or in addition to the physical
387 posting of the notice on the condominium property, the
388 association may, by reasonable rule, adopt a procedure for
389 conspicuously posting and repeatedly broadcasting the notice and
390 the agenda on a closed-circuit cable television system serving
391 the condominium association. However, if broadcast notice is
392 used in lieu of a notice physically posted on condominium
393 property, the notice and agenda must be broadcast at least four
394 times every broadcast hour of each day that a posted notice is
395 otherwise required under this section. If broadcast notice is
396 provided, the notice and agenda must be broadcast in a manner
397 and for a sufficient continuous length of time so as to allow an
398 average reader to observe the notice and read and comprehend the
399 entire content of the notice and the agenda. In addition to any
400 of the authorized means of providing notice of a meeting of the
Page 16 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
401 board, the association may, by rule, adopt a procedure for
402 conspicuously posting the meeting notice and the agenda on a
403 website serving the condominium association for at least the
404 minimum period of time for which a notice of a meeting is also
405 required to be physically posted on the condominium property.
406 Any rule adopted must shall, in addition to other matters,
407 include a requirement that the association send an electronic
408 notice in the same manner as a notice for a meeting of the
409 members, which must include a hyperlink to the website at which
410 the notice is posted, to unit owners whose e-mail addresses are
411 included in the association's official records.
412 3. Notice of any meeting in which regular or special
413 assessments against unit owners are to be considered must
414 specifically state that assessments will be considered and
415 provide the estimated cost and description of the purposes for
416 such assessments. If an agenda item relates to the approval of a
417 contract for goods or services, a copy of the contract must be
418 provided with the notice and be made available for inspection
419 and copying upon a written request from a unit owner or made
420 available on the association's website or through an application
421 that can be downloaded on a mobile device.
422 4. Meetings of a committee to take final action on behalf
423 of the board or make recommendations to the board regarding the
424 association budget are subject to this paragraph. Meetings of a
425 committee that does not take final action on behalf of the board
Page 17 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
426 or make recommendations to the board regarding the association
427 budget are subject to this section, unless those meetings are
428 exempted from this section by the bylaws of the association.
429 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the requirement that
430 board meetings and committee meetings be open to the unit owners
431 does not apply to:
432 a. Meetings between the board or a committee and the
433 association's attorney, with respect to proposed or pending
434 litigation, if the meeting is held for the purpose of seeking or
435 rendering legal advice; or
436 b. Board meetings held for the purpose of discussing
437 personnel matters.
438 (d) Unit owner meetings.—
439 1. An annual meeting of the unit owners must be held at
440 the location provided in the association bylaws and, if the
441 bylaws are silent as to the location, the meeting must be held
442 within 15 miles of the condominium property or within the same
443 county as the condominium property. However, such distance
444 requirement does not apply to an association governing a
445 timeshare condominium. If a unit owner meeting is conducted via
446 audio conference or video conference, or both, a unit owner may
447 vote electronically in the manner provided in s. 718.128.
448 2. Unit owner meetings, including the annual meeting of
449 the unit owners, may be conducted in person or via audio
450 conference or video conference, or both. If the annual meeting
Page 18 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
451 of the unit owners is conducted via audio conference or video
452 conference, or both, a quorum of the members of the board of
453 administration must be physically present at the physical
454 location where unit owners can attend the meeting. The location
455 must be provided in the association bylaws and, if the bylaws
456 are silent as to the location, the meeting must be held within
457 15 miles of the condominium property or within the same county
458 as the condominium property. If the unit owner meeting is
459 conducted via audio or video conference, or both, the audio
460 conference or video conference, or both, must be recorded and
461 such recording must be maintained as an official record of the
462 association. The division shall adopt rules pursuant to ss.
463 120.536 and 120.54 governing the requirements for meetings.
464 3. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a vacancy on the
465 board caused by the expiration of a director's term must be
466 filled by electing a new board member, and the election must be
467 by secret ballot. An election is not required if the number of
468 vacancies equals or exceeds the number of candidates. For
469 purposes of this paragraph, the term "candidate" means an
470 eligible person who has timely submitted the written notice, as
471 described in sub-subparagraph 4.a., of his or her intention to
472 become a candidate. Except in a timeshare or nonresidential
473 condominium, or if the staggered term of a board member does not
474 expire until a later annual meeting, or if all members' terms
475 would otherwise expire but there are no candidates, the terms of
Page 19 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
476 all board members expire at the annual meeting, and such members
477 may stand for reelection unless prohibited by the bylaws. Board
478 members may serve terms longer than 1 year if permitted by the
479 bylaws or articles of incorporation. A board member may not
480 serve more than 8 consecutive years unless approved by an
481 affirmative vote of unit owners representing two-thirds of all
482 votes cast in the election or unless there are not enough
483 eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at the
484 time of the vacancy. Only board service that occurs on or after
485 July 1, 2018, may be used when calculating a board member's term
486 limit. If the number of board members whose terms expire at the
487 annual meeting equals or exceeds the number of candidates, the
488 candidates become members of the board effective upon the
489 adjournment of the annual meeting. Unless the bylaws provide
490 otherwise, any remaining vacancies shall be filled by the
491 affirmative vote of the majority of the directors making up the
492 newly constituted board even if the directors constitute less
493 than a quorum or there is only one director. In a residential
494 condominium association of more than 10 units or in a
495 residential condominium association that does not include
496 timeshare units or timeshare interests, co-owners of a unit may
497 not serve as members of the board of directors at the same time
498 unless they own more than one unit or unless there are not
499 enough eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at
500 the time of the vacancy. A unit owner in a residential
Page 20 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
501 condominium desiring to be a candidate for board membership must
502 comply with sub-subparagraph 4.a. and must be eligible to be a
503 candidate to serve on the board of directors at the time of the
504 deadline for submitting a notice of intent to run in order to
505 have his or her name listed as a proper candidate on the ballot
506 or to serve on the board. A person who has been suspended or
507 removed by the division under this chapter, or who is delinquent
508 in the payment of any assessment due to the association, is not
509 eligible to be a candidate for board membership and may not be
510 listed on the ballot. For purposes of this paragraph, a person
511 is delinquent if a payment is not made by the due date as
512 specifically identified in the declaration of condominium,
513 bylaws, or articles of incorporation. If a due date is not
514 specifically identified in the declaration of condominium,
515 bylaws, or articles of incorporation, the due date is the first
516 day of the assessment period. A person who has been convicted of
517 any felony in this state or in a United States District or
518 Territorial Court, or who has been convicted of any offense in
519 another jurisdiction which would be considered a felony if
520 committed in this state, is not eligible for board membership
521 unless such felon's civil rights have been restored for at least
522 5 years as of the date such person seeks election to the board.
523 The validity of an action by the board is not affected if it is
524 later determined that a board member is ineligible for board
525 membership due to having been convicted of a felony. This
Page 21 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
526 subparagraph does not limit the term of a member of the board of
527 a nonresidential or timeshare condominium.
528 4. The bylaws must provide the method of calling meetings
529 of unit owners, including annual meetings. Written notice of an
530 annual meeting must include an agenda; be mailed, hand
531 delivered, or electronically transmitted to each unit owner at
532 least 14 days before the annual meeting; and be posted in a
533 conspicuous place on the condominium property or association
534 property at least 14 continuous days before the annual meeting.
535 Written notice of a meeting other than an annual meeting must
536 include an agenda; be mailed, hand delivered, or electronically
537 transmitted to each unit owner; and be posted in a conspicuous
538 place on the condominium property or association property within
539 the timeframe specified in the bylaws. If the bylaws do not
540 specify a timeframe for written notice of a meeting other than
541 an annual meeting, notice must be provided at least 14
542 continuous days before the meeting. Upon notice to the unit
543 owners, the board shall, by duly adopted rule, designate a
544 specific location on the condominium property or association
545 property at which all notices of unit owner meetings must be
546 posted. This requirement does not apply if there is no
547 condominium property for posting notices. In addition to the
548 physical posting of meeting notices, the association may, by
549 reasonable rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously posting and
550 repeatedly broadcasting the notice and the agenda on a closed-
Page 22 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
551 circuit cable television system serving the condominium
552 association. If broadcast notice is provided, the notice and
553 agenda must be broadcast in a manner and for a sufficient
554 continuous length of time so as to allow an average reader to
555 observe the notice and read and comprehend the entire content of
556 the notice and the agenda. In addition to any of the authorized
557 means of providing notice of a meeting of the board, the
558 association may, by rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously
559 posting the meeting notice and the agenda on a website serving
560 the condominium association for at least the minimum period of
561 time for which a notice of a meeting is also required to be
562 physically posted on the condominium property. Any rule adopted
563 shall, in addition to other matters, include a requirement that
564 the association send an electronic notice in the same manner as
565 a notice for a meeting of the members, which must include a
566 hyperlink to the website at which the notice is posted, to unit
567 owners whose e-mail addresses are included in the association's
568 official records. Unless a unit owner waives in writing the
569 right to receive notice of the annual meeting, such notice must
570 be hand delivered, mailed, or electronically transmitted to each
571 unit owner. Notice for meetings and notice for all other
572 purposes must be mailed to each unit owner at the address last
573 furnished to the association by the unit owner, or hand
574 delivered to each unit owner. However, if a unit is owned by
575 more than one person, the association must provide notice to the
Page 23 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
576 address that the developer identifies for that purpose and
577 thereafter as one or more of the owners of the unit advise the
578 association in writing, or if no address is given or the owners
579 of the unit do not agree, to the address provided on the deed of
580 record. An officer of the association, or the manager or other
581 person providing notice of the association meeting, must provide
582 an affidavit or United States Postal Service certificate of
583 mailing, to be included in the official records of the
584 association affirming that the notice was mailed or hand
585 delivered in accordance with this provision.
586 5. The members of the board of a residential condominium
587 shall be elected by written ballot or voting machine. Proxies
588 may not be used in electing the board in general elections or
589 elections to fill vacancies caused by recall, resignation, or
590 otherwise, unless otherwise provided in this chapter. This
591 subparagraph does not apply to an association governing a
592 timeshare condominium.
593 a. At least 60 days before a scheduled election, the
594 association shall mail, deliver, or electronically transmit, by
595 separate association mailing or included in another association
596 mailing, delivery, or transmission, including regularly
597 published newsletters, to each unit owner entitled to a vote, a
598 first notice of the date of the election. A unit owner or other
599 eligible person desiring to be a candidate for the board must
600 give written notice of his or her intent to be a candidate to
Page 24 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
601 the association at least 40 days before a scheduled election.
602 Together with the written notice and agenda as set forth in
603 subparagraph 3., the association shall mail, deliver, or
604 electronically transmit a second notice of the election to all
605 unit owners entitled to vote, together with a ballot that lists
606 all candidates not less than 14 days or more than 34 days before
607 the date of the election. Upon request of a candidate, an
608 information sheet, no larger than 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches,
609 which must be furnished by the candidate at least 35 days before
610 the election, must be included with the mailing, delivery, or
611 transmission of the ballot, with the costs of mailing, delivery,
612 or electronic transmission and copying to be borne by the
613 association. The association is not liable for the contents of
614 the information sheets prepared by the candidates. In order to
615 reduce costs, the association may print or duplicate the
616 information sheets on both sides of the paper. The division
617 shall by rule establish voting procedures consistent with this
618 sub-subparagraph, including rules establishing procedures for
619 giving notice by electronic transmission and rules providing for
620 the secrecy of ballots. Elections are shall be decided by a
621 plurality of ballots cast. There is no quorum requirement;
622 however, at least 20 percent of the eligible voters must cast a
623 ballot in order to have a valid election. A unit owner may not
624 authorize any other person to vote his or her ballot, and any
625 ballots improperly cast are invalid. A unit owner who violates
Page 25 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
626 this provision may be fined by the association in accordance
627 with s. 718.303. A unit owner who needs assistance in casting
628 the ballot for the reasons stated in s. 101.051 may obtain such
629 assistance. The regular election must occur on the date of the
630 annual meeting. Notwithstanding this sub-subparagraph, an
631 election is not required unless more candidates file notices of
632 intent to run or are nominated than board vacancies exist.
633 b. A director of a board of an association of a
634 residential condominium shall:
635 (I) Certify in writing to the secretary of the association
636 that he or she has read the association's declaration of
637 condominium, articles of incorporation, bylaws, and current
638 written policies; that he or she will work to uphold such
639 documents and policies to the best of his or her ability; and
640 that he or she will faithfully discharge his or her fiduciary
641 responsibility to the association's members.
642 (II) Submit to the secretary of the association a
643 certificate of having satisfactorily completed the educational
644 curriculum administered by the division or a division-approved
645 condominium education provider. The educational curriculum must
646 be at least 4 hours long and include instruction on milestone
647 inspections, structural integrity reserve studies, elections,
648 recordkeeping, financial literacy and transparency, levying of
649 fines, and notice and meeting requirements.
650
Page 26 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
651 Each newly elected or appointed director must submit to the
652 secretary of the association the written certification and
653 educational certificate within 1 year before being elected or
654 appointed or 90 days after the date of election or appointment.
655 A director of an association of a residential condominium who
656 was elected or appointed before July 1, 2024, must comply with
657 the written certification and educational certificate
658 requirements in this sub-subparagraph by June 30, 2025. The
659 written certification and educational certificate is valid for 7
660 years after the date of issuance and does not have to be
661 resubmitted as long as the director serves on the board without
662 interruption during the 7-year period. A director who is
663 appointed by the developer may satisfy the educational
664 certificate requirement in sub-sub-subparagraph (II) for any
665 subsequent appointment to a board by a developer within 7 years
666 after the date of issuance of the most recent educational
667 certificate, including any interruption of service on a board or
668 appointment to a board in another association within that 7-year
669 period. One year after submission of the most recent written
670 certification and educational certificate, and annually
671 thereafter, a director of an association of a residential
672 condominium must submit to the secretary of the association a
673 certificate of having satisfactorily completed at least 1 hour
674 of continuing education administered by the division, or a
675 division-approved condominium education provider, relating to
Page 27 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
676 any recent changes to this chapter and the related
677 administrative rules during the past year. A director of an
678 association of a residential condominium who fails to timely
679 file the written certification and educational certificate is
680 suspended from service on the board until he or she complies
681 with this sub-subparagraph. The board may temporarily fill the
682 vacancy during the period of suspension. The secretary shall
683 cause the association to retain a director's written
684 certification and educational certificate for inspection by the
685 members for 7 years after a director's election or the duration
686 of the director's uninterrupted tenure, whichever is longer.
687 Failure to have such written certification and educational
688 certificate on file does not affect the validity of any board
689 action.
690 c. Any challenge to the election process must be commenced
691 within 60 days after the election results are announced.
692 6. Any approval by unit owners called for by this chapter
693 or the applicable declaration or bylaws, including, but not
694 limited to, the approval requirement in s. 718.111(8), must be
695 made at a duly noticed meeting of unit owners and is subject to
696 all requirements of this chapter or the applicable condominium
697 documents relating to unit owner decisionmaking, except that
698 unit owners may take action by written agreement, without
699 meetings, on matters for which action by written agreement
700 without meetings is expressly allowed by the applicable bylaws
Page 28 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
701 or declaration or any law that provides for such action.
702 7. Unit owners may waive notice of specific meetings if
703 allowed by the applicable bylaws or declaration or any law.
704 Notice of meetings of the board of administration; unit owner
705 meetings, except unit owner meetings called to recall board
706 members under paragraph (l); and committee meetings may be given
707 by electronic transmission to unit owners who consent to receive
708 notice by electronic transmission. A unit owner who consents to
709 receiving notices by electronic transmission is solely
710 responsible for removing or bypassing filters that block receipt
711 of mass e-mails sent to members on behalf of the association in
712 the course of giving electronic notices.
713 8. Unit owners have the right to participate in meetings
714 of unit owners with reference to all designated agenda items.
715 However, the association may adopt reasonable rules governing
716 the frequency, duration, and manner of unit owner participation.
717 9. A unit owner may tape record or videotape a meeting of
718 the unit owners subject to reasonable rules adopted by the
719 division.
720 10. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any vacancy
721 occurring on the board before the expiration of a term may be
722 filled by the affirmative vote of the majority of the remaining
723 directors, even if the remaining directors constitute less than
724 a quorum, or by the sole remaining director. In the alternative,
725 a board may hold an election to fill the vacancy, in which case
Page 29 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
726 the election procedures must conform to sub-subparagraph 4.a.
727 unless the association governs 10 units or fewer and has opted
728 out of the statutory election process, in which case the bylaws
729 of the association control. Unless otherwise provided in the
730 bylaws, a board member appointed or elected under this section
731 shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the seat being
732 filled. Filling vacancies created by recall is governed by
733 paragraph (l) and rules adopted by the division.
734 11. This chapter does not limit the use of general or
735 limited proxies, require the use of general or limited proxies,
736 or require the use of a written ballot or voting machine for any
737 agenda item or election at any meeting of a timeshare
738 condominium association or nonresidential condominium
739 association.
740
741 Notwithstanding subparagraph (b)2. and sub-subparagraph 4.a., an
742 association of 10 or fewer units may, by affirmative vote of a
743 majority of the total voting interests, provide for different
744 voting and election procedures in its bylaws, which may be by a
745 proxy specifically delineating the different voting and election
746 procedures. The different voting and election procedures may
747 provide for elections to be conducted by limited or general
748 proxy.
749 (e) Budget meeting.—
750 1. Any meeting at which a proposed annual budget of an
Page 30 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
751 association will be considered by the board or unit owners is
752 shall be open to all unit owners. A meeting of the board or unit
753 owners at which a proposed annual association budget will be
754 considered may be conducted by audio conference or video
755 conference, or both. The division shall adopt rules pursuant to
756 ss. 120.536 and 120.54 governing the requirements for such
757 meetings. A sound transmitting device must be used so that the
758 conversation of such members may be heard by the board or
759 committee members attending in person, as well as any unit
760 owners present at the meeting. At least 14 days before such a
761 meeting, the board shall hand deliver to each unit owner, mail
762 to each unit owner at the address last furnished to the
763 association by the unit owner, or electronically transmit to the
764 location furnished by the unit owner for that purpose a notice
765 of such meeting and a copy of the proposed annual budget. An
766 officer or a manager of the association, or other person
767 providing notice of such meeting, shall execute an affidavit
768 evidencing compliance with such notice requirement, and such
769 affidavit shall be filed among the official records of the
770 association.
771 2.a. If a board proposes in any fiscal year an annual
772 budget which requires assessments against unit owners which
773 exceed 115 percent of assessments for the preceding fiscal year,
774 the board must shall simultaneously propose a substitute budget
775 that does not include any discretionary expenditures that are
Page 31 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
776 not required to be in the budget. The substitute budget must be
777 proposed at the budget meeting before the adoption of the annual
778 budget. At least 14 days before such budget meeting in which a
779 substitute budget will be proposed, the board shall hand deliver
780 to each unit owner, or mail to each unit owner at the address
781 last furnished to the association, a notice of the meeting. An
782 officer or manager of the association, or other person providing
783 notice of such meeting shall execute an affidavit evidencing
784 compliance with this notice requirement, and such affidavit must
785 shall be filed among the official records of the association.
786 Unit owners shall must consider and may adopt a substitute
787 budget at the meeting. A substitute budget is adopted if
788 approved by a majority of all voting interests unless the bylaws
789 require adoption by a greater percentage of voting interests. If
790 a substitute budget is not adopted, the annual budget previously
791 initially proposed by the board may be adopted.
792 b. Any determination of whether assessments exceed 115
793 percent of assessments for the previous prior fiscal year must
794 shall exclude any authorized provision for required reserves for
795 repair or replacement of the condominium property; anticipated
796 expenses of the association which the board does not expect to
797 be incurred on a regular or annual basis for the repair,
798 maintenance, or replacement of the items listed in paragraph
799 (g); and insurance premiums.
800 c. If the developer controls the board, assessments may
Page 32 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
801 not exceed 115 percent of assessments for the prior fiscal year
802 unless approved by a majority of all voting interests.
803 Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
804 718.1265, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
805 718.1265 Association emergency powers.—
806 (1) To the extent allowed by law, unless specifically
807 prohibited by the declaration of condominium, the articles, or
808 the bylaws of an association, and consistent with s. 617.0830,
809 the board of administration, in response to damage or injury
810 caused by or anticipated in connection with an emergency, as
811 defined in s. 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is
812 declared pursuant to s. 252.36 in the locale in which the
813 condominium is located, may exercise the following powers:
814 (a) Conduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections,
815 and membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone,
816 real-time audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar
817 real-time electronic, audio, or video communication with notice
818 given as is practicable. Such notice may be given in any
819 practicable manner, including publication, radio, United States
820 mail, the Internet, electronic transmission, public service
821 announcements, and conspicuous posting on the condominium
822 property or association property or any other means the board
823 deems reasonable under the circumstances. Notice of decisions
824 also may be communicated as provided in this paragraph.
825 Section 5. Subsections (3) through (29) of section
Page 33 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
826 719.103, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (4)
827 through (30), respectively, and a new subsection (3) is added to
828 that section, to read:
829 719.103 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
830 (3) "Audio conference" means a real-time, audio-based
831 meeting between two or more people in different locations using
832 an audio-enabled device.
833 Section 6. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
834 719.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
835 719.106 Bylaws; cooperative ownership.—
836 (1) MANDATORY PROVISIONS.—The bylaws or other cooperative
837 documents shall provide for the following, and if they do not,
838 they shall be deemed to include the following:
839 (b) Quorum; voting requirements; proxies.—
840 1. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the percentage
841 of voting interests required to constitute a quorum at a meeting
842 of the members shall be a majority of voting interests, and
843 decisions shall be made by owners of a majority of the voting
844 interests. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, or in the
845 articles of incorporation, bylaws, or other cooperative
846 documents, and except as provided in subparagraph (d)1.,
847 decisions shall be made by owners of a majority of the voting
848 interests represented at a meeting at which a quorum is present.
849 2. Except as specifically otherwise provided herein, after
850 January 1, 1992, unit owners may not vote by general proxy, but
Page 34 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
851 may vote by limited proxies substantially conforming to a
852 limited proxy form adopted by the division. Limited proxies and
853 general proxies may be used to establish a quorum. Limited
854 proxies shall be used for votes taken to waive or reduce
855 reserves in accordance with subparagraph (j)2., for votes taken
856 to waive the financial reporting requirements of s.
857 719.104(4)(b), for votes taken to amend the articles of
858 incorporation or bylaws pursuant to this section, and for any
859 other matter for which this chapter requires or permits a vote
860 of the unit owners. Except as provided in paragraph (d), after
861 January 1, 1992, a no proxy, limited or general, may not shall
862 be used in the election of board members. General proxies may be
863 used for other matters for which limited proxies are not
864 required, and may also be used in voting for nonsubstantive
865 changes to items for which a limited proxy is required and
866 given. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, unit
867 owners may vote in person at unit owner meetings. This section
868 does not Nothing contained herein shall limit the use of general
869 proxies or require the use of limited proxies or require the use
870 of limited proxies for any agenda item or election at any
871 meeting of a timeshare cooperative.
872 3. Any proxy given is shall be effective only for the
873 specific meeting for which originally given and any lawfully
874 adjourned meetings thereof. In no event shall any proxy be valid
875 for a period longer than 90 days after the date of the first
Page 35 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
876 meeting for which it was given. Every proxy is shall be
877 revocable at any time at the pleasure of the unit owner
878 executing it.
879 4. A member of the board of administration or a committee
880 may submit in writing his or her agreement or disagreement with
881 any action taken at a meeting that the member did not attend.
882 This agreement or disagreement may not be used as a vote for or
883 against the action taken and may not be used for the purposes of
884 creating a quorum.
885 5. A board member or committee member participating in a
886 meeting via telephone, real-time audioconferencing or
887 videoconferencing, or similar real-time electronic, audio, or
888 video communication counts toward a quorum, and such member may
889 vote as if physically present. A speaker must be used so that
890 the conversation of such members may be heard by the board or
891 committee members attending in person, as well as by any unit
892 owners present at a meeting.
893 Section 7. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
894 719.128, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
895 719.128 Association emergency powers.—
896 (1) To the extent allowed by law, unless specifically
897 prohibited by the cooperative documents, and consistent with s.
898 617.0830, the board of administration, in response to damage or
899 injury caused by or anticipated in connection with an emergency,
900 as defined in s. 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is
Page 36 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
901 declared pursuant to s. 252.36 in the area encompassed by the
902 cooperative, may exercise the following powers:
903 (a) Conduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections,
904 or membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, real-
905 time audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar real-
906 time electronic, audio, or video communication after notice of
907 the meetings and board decisions is provided in as practicable a
908 manner as possible, including via publication, radio, United
909 States mail, the Internet, electronic transmission, public
910 service announcements, conspicuous posting on the cooperative
911 property, or any other means the board deems appropriate under
912 the circumstances. Notice of decisions may also be communicated
913 as provided in this paragraph.
914 Section 8. Subsections (2) through (13) of section
915 720.301, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
916 through (14), respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to
917 that section, to read:
918 720.301 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
919 (2) "Audio conference" means a real-time, audio-based
920 meeting between two or more people in different locations using
921 an audio-enabled device.
922 Section 9. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
923 720.316, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
924 720.316 Association emergency powers.—
925 (1) To the extent allowed by law, unless specifically
Page 37 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
926 prohibited by the declaration or other recorded governing
927 documents, and consistent with s. 617.0830, the board of
928 directors, in response to damage or injury caused by or
929 anticipated in connection with an emergency, as defined in s.
930 252.34(4), for which a state of emergency is declared pursuant
931 to s. 252.36 in the area encompassed by the association, may
932 exercise the following powers:
933 (a) Conduct board meetings, committee meetings, elections,
934 or membership meetings, in whole or in part, by telephone, real-
935 time audioconferencing or videoconferencing, or similar real-
936 time electronic, audio, or video communication after notice of
937 the meetings and board decisions is provided in as practicable a
938 manner as possible, including via publication, radio, United
939 States mail, the Internet, electronic transmission, public
940 service announcements, conspicuous posting on the common area,
941 or any other means the board deems appropriate under the
942 circumstances. Notice of decisions may also be communicated as
943 provided in this paragraph.
944 Section 10. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
945 718.501, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (u) of that
946 subsection is reenacted, to read:
947 718.501 Authority, responsibility, and duties of Division
948 of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes.—
949 (1) The division may enforce and ensure compliance with
950 this chapter and rules relating to the development,
Page 38 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
951 construction, sale, lease, ownership, operation, and management
952 of residential condominium units and complaints. In performing
953 its duties, the division has complete jurisdiction to
954 investigate complaints and enforce compliance with respect to
955 associations that are still under developer control or the
956 control of a bulk assignee or bulk buyer pursuant to part VII of
957 this chapter and complaints against developers, bulk assignees,
958 or bulk buyers involving improper turnover or failure to
959 turnover, pursuant to s. 718.301. However, after turnover has
960 occurred, the division has jurisdiction to review records and
961 investigate complaints related only to:
962 (a)1. Procedural aspects and records relating to financial
963 issues, including annual financial reporting under s.
964 718.111(13); assessments for common expenses, fines, and
965 commingling of reserve and operating funds under s. 718.111(14);
966 use of debit cards for unintended purposes under s. 718.111(15);
967 the annual operating budget and the allocation of reserve funds
968 under s. 718.112(2)(f); financial records under s.
969 718.111(12)(a)11.; and any other record necessary to determine
970 the revenues and expenses of the association.
971 2. Elections, including election and voting requirements
972 under s. 718.112(2)(b) and (d), recall of board members under s.
973 718.112(2)(l), electronic voting under s. 718.128, and elections
974 that occur during an emergency under s. 718.1265(1)(a).
975 3. The maintenance of and unit owner access to association
Page 39 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
976 records under s. 718.111(12), including, but not limited to,
977 audio or video recordings.
978 4. The procedural aspects of meetings, including unit
979 owner meetings, quorums, voting requirements, proxies, board of
980 administration meetings, and budget meetings under s.
981 718.112(2).
982 5. The disclosure of conflicts of interest under ss.
983 718.111(1)(a) and 718.3027, including limitations contained in
984 s. 718.111(3)(f).
985 6. The removal of a board director or officer under ss.
986 718.111(1)(a) and (15) and 718.112(2)(p) and (q).
987 7. The procedural completion of structural integrity
988 reserve studies under s. 718.112(2)(g) and the milestone
989 inspections under s. 553.899.
990 8. Completion of repairs required by a milestone
991 inspection under s. 553.899.
992 9. Any written inquiries by unit owners to the association
993 relating to such matters, including written inquiries under s.
994 718.112(2)(a)2.
995 10. The requirement for associations to maintain an
996 insurance policy or fidelity bonding for all persons who control
997 or disperse funds of the association under s. 718.111(11)(h).
998 11. Board member education requirements under s.
999 718.112(2)(d)5.b.
1000 12. Reporting requirements for structural integrity
Page 40 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1001 reserve studies under subsection (3) and under s.
1002 718.112(2)(g)12.
1003 (u) If the division receives a complaint regarding access
1004 to official records on the association's website or through an
1005 application that can be downloaded on a mobile device under s.
1006 718.111(12)(g), the division may request access to the
1007 association's website or application and investigate. The
1008 division may adopt rules to carry out this paragraph.
1009 Section 11. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
1010 336.125, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1011 336.125 Closing and abandonment of roads; optional
1012 conveyance to homeowners' association; traffic control
1013 jurisdiction.—
1014 (1)(a) In addition to the authority provided in s. 336.12,
1015 the governing body of the county may abandon the roads and
1016 rights-of-way dedicated in a recorded residential subdivision
1017 plat and simultaneously convey the county's interest in such
1018 roads, rights-of-way, and appurtenant drainage facilities to a
1019 homeowners' association for the subdivision, if the following
1020 conditions have been met:
1021 1. The homeowners' association has requested the
1022 abandonment and conveyance in writing for the purpose of
1023 converting the subdivision to a gated neighborhood with
1024 restricted public access.
1025 2. No fewer than four-fifths of the owners of record of
Page 41 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1026 property located in the subdivision have consented in writing to
1027 the abandonment and simultaneous conveyance to the homeowners'
1028 association.
1029 3. The homeowners' association is both a corporation not
1030 for profit organized and in good standing under chapter 617, and
1031 a "homeowners' association" as defined in s. 720.301 s.
1032 720.301(9) with the power to levy and collect assessments for
1033 routine and periodic major maintenance and operation of street
1034 lighting, drainage, sidewalks, and pavement in the subdivision.
1035 4. The homeowners' association has entered into and
1036 executed such agreements, covenants, warranties, and other
1037 instruments; has provided, or has provided assurance of, such
1038 funds, reserve funds, and funding sources; and has satisfied
1039 such other requirements and conditions as may be established or
1040 imposed by the county with respect to the ongoing operation,
1041 maintenance, and repair and the periodic reconstruction or
1042 replacement of the roads, drainage, street lighting, and
1043 sidewalks in the subdivision after the abandonment by the
1044 county.
1045 Section 12. Subsection (2) of section 558.002, Florida
1046 Statutes, is amended to read:
1047 558.002 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
1048 (2) "Association" has the same meaning as in s. 718.103,
1049 s. 719.103, s. 720.301 s. 719.103(2), s. 720.301(9), or s.
1050 723.075.
Page 42 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1051 Section 13. Section 617.0725, Florida Statutes, is amended
1052 to read:
1053 617.0725 Quorum.—An amendment to the articles of
1054 incorporation or the bylaws which adds, changes, or deletes a
1055 greater or lesser quorum or voting requirement must meet the
1056 same quorum or voting requirement and be adopted by the same
1057 vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum
1058 and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be
1059 adopted, whichever is greater. This section does not apply to
1060 any corporation that is an association, as defined in s.
1061 720.301(10) s. 720.301(9), or any corporation regulated under
1062 chapter 718 or chapter 719.
1063 Section 14. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1064 718.116, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1065 718.116 Assessments; liability; lien and priority;
1066 interest; collection.—
1067 (1)
1068 (b)1. The liability of a first mortgagee or its successor
1069 or assignees who acquire title to a unit by foreclosure or by
1070 deed in lieu of foreclosure for the unpaid assessments that
1071 became due before the mortgagee's acquisition of title is
1072 limited to the lesser of:
1073 a. The unit's unpaid common expenses and regular periodic
1074 assessments which accrued or came due during the 12 months
1075 immediately preceding the acquisition of title and for which
Page 43 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1076 payment in full has not been received by the association; or
1077 b. One percent of the original mortgage debt. The
1078 provisions of this paragraph apply only if the first mortgagee
1079 joined the association as a defendant in the foreclosure action.
1080 Joinder of the association is not required if, on the date the
1081 complaint is filed, the association was dissolved or did not
1082 maintain an office or agent for service of process at a location
1083 which was known to or reasonably discoverable by the mortgagee.
1084 2. An association, or its successor or assignee, that
1085 acquires title to a unit through the foreclosure of its lien for
1086 assessments is not liable for any unpaid assessments, late fees,
1087 interest, or reasonable attorney's fees and costs that came due
1088 before the association's acquisition of title in favor of any
1089 other association, as defined in s. 718.103 or s. 720.301(10) s.
1090 720.301(9), which holds a superior lien interest on the unit.
1091 This subparagraph is intended to clarify existing law.
1092 Section 15. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph
1093 (e) of subsection (2) of section 718.503, Florida Statutes, are
1094 amended to read:
1095 718.503 Developer disclosure prior to sale; nondeveloper
1096 unit owner disclosure prior to sale; voidability.—
1097 (1) DEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
1098 (d) Milestone inspection, turnover inspection report, or
1099 structural integrity reserve study.—If the association is
1100 required to have completed a milestone inspection as described
Page 44 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1101 in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1102 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1103 integrity reserve study, and the association has not completed
1104 the milestone inspection, the turnover inspection report, or the
1105 structural integrity reserve study, each contract entered into
1106 after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit
1107 shall contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that
1108 the association is required to have a milestone inspection, a
1109 turnover inspection report, or a structural integrity reserve
1110 study and has not completed such inspection, report, or study,
1111 as appropriate. If the association is not required to have a
1112 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899 or a structural
1113 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1114 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1115 contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that the
1116 association is not required to have a milestone inspection or a
1117 structural integrity reserve study, as appropriate. If the
1118 association has completed a milestone inspection as described in
1119 s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1120 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1121 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1122 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1123 contain in conspicuous type:
1124 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
1125 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
Page 45 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1126 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1127 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1128 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1129 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1130 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1131 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND
1132 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 15
1133 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
1134 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
1135 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
1136 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
1137 CANCEL WITHIN 15 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
1138 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
1139 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1140 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1141 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1142 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1143 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1144 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1145 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND
1146 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
1147 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
1148 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 15
1149 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
1150 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
Page 46 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1151 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
1152 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
1153 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q),
1154 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
1155 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
1156 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
1157 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
1158 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
1159
1160 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
1161 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
1162 closing.
1163 (2) NONDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
1164 (e) If the association is required to have completed a
1165 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover
1166 inspection report for a turnover inspection performed on or
1167 after July 1, 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, and
1168 the association has not completed the milestone inspection, the
1169 turnover inspection report, or the structural integrity reserve
1170 study, each contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for
1171 the sale of a residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type
1172 a statement indicating that the association is required to have
1173 a milestone inspection, a turnover inspection report, or a
1174 structural integrity reserve study and has not completed such
1175 inspection, report, or study, as appropriate. If the association
Page 47 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1176 is not required to have a milestone inspection as described in
1177 s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve study, each
1178 contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a
1179 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type a statement
1180 indicating that the association is not required to have a
1181 milestone inspection or a structural integrity reserve study, as
1182 appropriate. If the association has completed a milestone
1183 inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection
1184 report for a turnover inspection performed on or after July 1,
1185 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, each contract
1186 entered into after December 31, 2024, for the resale of a
1187 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type:
1188 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
1189 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1190 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1191 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1192 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1193 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1194 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1195 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND
1196 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 7
1197 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
1198 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
1199 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
1200 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
Page 48 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1201 CANCEL WITHIN 7 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
1202 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
1203 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1204 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1205 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1206 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1207 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1208 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1209 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND
1210 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
1211 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
1212 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 7
1213 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
1214 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
1215 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
1216 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
1217 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q),
1218 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
1219 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
1220 718.103(27) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
1221 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
1222 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
1223
1224 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
1225 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
Page 49 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1226 closing.
1227 Section 16. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph
1228 (d) of subsection (2) of section 719.503, Florida Statutes, are
1229 amended to read:
1230 719.503 Disclosure prior to sale.—
1231 (1) DEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
1232 (d) Milestone inspection, turnover inspection report, or
1233 structural integrity reserve study.—If the association is
1234 required to have completed a milestone inspection as described
1235 in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1236 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1237 integrity reserve study, and the association has not completed
1238 the milestone inspection, the turnover inspection report, or the
1239 structural integrity reserve study, each contract entered into
1240 after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit
1241 shall contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that
1242 the association is required to have a milestone inspection, a
1243 turnover inspection report, or a structural integrity reserve
1244 study and has not completed such inspection, report, or study,
1245 as appropriate. If the association is not required to have a
1246 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899 or a structural
1247 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1248 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1249 contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that the
1250 association is not required to have a milestone inspection or a
Page 50 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1251 structural integrity reserve study, as appropriate. If the
1252 association has completed a milestone inspection as described in
1253 s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover
1254 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural
1255 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after
1256 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall
1257 contain in conspicuous type:
1258 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
1259 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1260 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1261 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1262 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1263 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1264 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1265 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
1266 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 15
1267 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
1268 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
1269 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
1270 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
1271 CANCEL WITHIN 15 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
1272 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
1273 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1274 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1275 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
Page 51 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1276 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1277 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1278 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1279 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
1280 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
1281 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
1282 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 15
1283 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
1284 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
1285 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
1286 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
1287 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 719.301(4)(p) AND (q),
1288 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
1289 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
1290 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
1291 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
1292 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
1293
1294 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
1295 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
1296 closing.
1297 (2) NONDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.—
1298 (d) If the association is required to have completed a
1299 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover
1300 inspection report for a turnover inspection performed on or
Page 52 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1301 after July 1, 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, and
1302 the association has not completed the milestone inspection, the
1303 turnover inspection report, or the structural integrity reserve
1304 study, each contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for
1305 the sale of a residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type
1306 a statement indicating that the association is required to have
1307 a milestone inspection, a turnover inspection report, or a
1308 structural integrity reserve study and has not completed such
1309 inspection, report, or study, as appropriate. If the association
1310 is not required to have a milestone inspection as described in
1311 s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve study, each
1312 contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a
1313 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type a statement
1314 indicating that the association is not required to have a
1315 milestone inspection or a structural integrity reserve study, as
1316 appropriate. If the association has completed a milestone
1317 inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection
1318 report for a turnover inspection performed on or after July 1,
1319 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, each contract
1320 entered into after December 31, 2024, for the resale of a
1321 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type:
1322 1. A clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES
1323 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1324 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1325 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
Page 53 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1326 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1327 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1328 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1329 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
1330 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 7
1331 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE
1332 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and
1333 2. A clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY
1334 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYER'S INTENTION TO
1335 CANCEL WITHIN 7 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL
1336 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE
1337 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-
1338 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED
1339 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF
1340 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION
1341 719.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A
1342 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY
1343 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND
1344 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED
1345 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER
1346 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 7
1347 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER
1348 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED
1349 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN
1350 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER
Page 54 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1351 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 719.301(4)(p) AND (q),
1352 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATION'S MOST RECENT
1353 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS
1354 719.103(25) 719.103(24) AND 719.106(1)(k), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF
1355 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYER'S RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL
1356 TERMINATE AT CLOSING.
1357
1358 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this
1359 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before
1360 closing.
1361 Section 17. Paragraph (d) of subsection (2) of section
1362 720.3085, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1363 720.3085 Payment for assessments; lien claims.—
1364 (2)
1365 (d) An association, or its successor or assignee, that
1366 acquires title to a parcel through the foreclosure of its lien
1367 for assessments is not liable for any unpaid assessments, late
1368 fees, interest, or reasonable attorney's fees and costs that
1369 came due before the association's acquisition of title in favor
1370 of any other association, as defined in s. 718.103 or s.
1371 720.301(10) s. 720.301(9), which holds a superior lien interest
1372 on the parcel. This paragraph is intended to clarify existing
1373 law.
1374 Section 18. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
1375 made by this act to section 719.106, Florida Statutes, in a
Page 55 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1541 2026
1376 reference thereto, section 723.0791, Florida Statutes, is
1377 reenacted to read:
1378 723.0791 Mobile home cooperative homeowners' associations;
1379 elections.—The provisions of s. 719.106(1)(b) notwithstanding,
1380 the election of board members in a mobile home cooperative
1381 homeowners' association may be carried out in the manner
1382 provided for in the bylaws of the association. A mobile home
1383 cooperative is a residential cooperative consisting of real
1384 property to which 10 or more mobile homes are located or are
1385 affixed.
1386 Section 19. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 56 of 56
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1541-00